Utah statutes.
76-5-403.   Sodomy -- Forcible sodomy.
(1)  A person commits sodomy when the actor engages in any sexual act with a
person who is 14 years of age or older involving the genitals of one person
and mouth or anus of another person, regardless of the sex of either
participant.
(2)  A person commits forcible sodomy when the actor commits sodomy upon
another without the other's consent.
(3)  Sodomy is a class B misdemeanor.
(4)  Forcible sodomy is a felony of the first degree, punishable by a term of
imprisonment of:
(a)  except as provided in Subsection (4)(b) or (c), not less than five years
and which may be for life;
(b)  except as provided in Subsection (4)(c) or (5), 15 years and which may be
for life, if the trier of fact finds that during the course of the commission
of the forcible sodomy the defendant caused serious bodily injury to another;
or
(c)  life without parole, if the trier of fact finds that at the time of the
commission of the forcible sodomy the defendant was previously convicted of a
grievous sexual offense.
(5)  If, when imposing a sentence under Subsection (4)(b), a court finds that
a lesser term than the term described in Subsection (4)(b) is in the interests
of justice and states the reasons for this finding on the record, the court
may impose a term of imprisonment of not less than:
(a)  10 years and which may be for life; or
(b)  six years and which may be for life.
(6)  The provisions of Subsection (5) do not apply when a person is sentenced
under Subsection (4)(a) or (c).
(7)  Imprisonment under Subsection (4)(b), (4)(c), or (5) is mandatory in
accordance with Section 76-3-406.
